en: apricot kernel, apricot kernels
ar: نواة مشمش
bg: кайсиеви ядки
ca: llavor d'albercoc
da: abrikoskerne, abrikoskerner
de: Aprikosenkern, Aprikosenkerne
eo: abrikota kerno
es: huesos de albaricoque, semilla de albaricoque
fa: مغز هسته زردآلو
fi: aprikoosinsiemen, aprikoosinsiemenet
fr: noyau d'abricot, noyaux d'abricots
hr: koštice marelice
hu: sárgabarackmag
hy: ծիրանի կորիզ
it: noccioli di albicocca, mandorle d'albicocca, armellina
ja: 杏仁
ko: 살구씨
nb: aprikoskjerner
nl: abrikozenpit, abrikozenpitten
ru: зерно абрикоса
sl: marelična koščica
sv: aprikoskärnor
tr: kayısı çekirdeği
uk: аброкосове ядро
zh: 杏仁

en: apricot jam, apricot marmalade
es: mermelada de albaricoque
hr: marmelada marelica, marelica džem, namaz od marelice, voćni namaz od marelice
it: confettura di albicocche, marmellata di albicocche, confettura alle albicocche

en: apricot flavouring
hr: aroma marelice
it: aroma (albicocca), aroma (albicocche), aroma di albicocca, aroma di albicocche, aroma d'albicocche, aroma d'albicocca

en: banana
af: Piesang
am: ሙዝ
an: Banana
ar: موز
as: কল
ay: Puquta
az: Banan
ba: Банан
be: Банан
bg: Банан
bh: केला
bi: Banana
bn: কলা
bo: ངང་ལག
br: Bananez
bs: Banana
ca: Banana, plàtan, plàtans
ce: Банан
co: Banana
cs: Banán, banánových, banánová
cy: Banana
da: Banan, bananer
de: Bananen, Banane
dv: ދޮންކެޔޮ
ee: Akɔɖu
el: μπανάνες, Μπανάνα
eo: Banano
es: plátano, banana
et: Banaan
eu: Banana
fa: موز
fi: Banaani
fr: banane, bananes
ga: Banana
gd: Banana
gl: Banana
gu: કેળાં
gv: Bananey
he: בננה
hi: केला
hr: banana, banane, od banane
ht: Bannann
hu: Banán
hy: Բանան
ia: Banana
id: Pisang
io: Banano
is: Banani
it: banana
ja: バナナ, ばなな
jv: Gedhang
kk: Банан
km: ចេក
kn: ಬಾಳೆ ಹಣ್ಣು
ko: 바나나
ks: کیل
ku: Mûz
ky: Банан
la: Musa
ln: Etabé
lv: Banāni
mg: Akondro
mk: Банана
ml: വാഴ
mn: Гадил
mr: केळ
ms: Pisang
my: ငှက်ပျော
nb: banan, bananer
ne: केरा
nl: banaan, bananen
nn: Banan
nv: Hashkʼaan
oc: Banana
or: କଦଳୀ
pa: ਕੇਲਾ
pl: banan, banany, bananowe, bananowy, bananowa, banana, bananów, bananowych
ps: كيله
pt: banana, bananas
ru: Банан
rw: Umuneke
sa: कदलीफलम्
sc: Banana
sd: ڪيلو
sh: Banana
si: කෙසෙල්
sk: Banán
sl: Banana
sm: Fa'i
so: Moos
sq: Bananja
sr: Банана
su: Cau
sv: Banan
sw: Ndizi
ta: வாழைப்பழம்
te: అరటి
tg: Банан
th: กล้วย
tl: Saging
tn: Banana
tr: Muz
ty: Meià
uk: Банан
ur: کیلا
uz: Banan
vi: Chuối
yi: באנאן
yo: Ọ̀gẹ̀dẹ̀
za: Gyoijhom
zh: 香蕉

en: matoki, matoke, matokee, matoke banana, green banana
fr: matooke, matoke
it: matoki (platano non maturo)

en: cavendish banana
fr: banane cavendish, banane cavendish montagne
it: banana Cavendish

en: plantain banana
de: Plantainbanane
fr: banane plantain, bananes plantain
hr: trputac banana
it: banana platano
la: musa paradisiaca

en: plantain
es: platano macho
fi: ratamo
fr: plantain
hr: trputac
it: piantaggine
nl: weegbree
pl: plantan, plantany, plantana

en: green banana flour
it: farina di banane verdi
ru: Мука зелёных бананов

en: arctostaphylos uva-ursi
fr: arctostaphylos uva-ursi
hr: arctostaphylos uva-ursi, medvjetka, medvjetke

en: betula
hr: betula, betula spp, breze
it: betulla

en: breadfruit
af: broodvrugt
az: Çörək ağacı
bi: Bredfrut
bo: གོ་རེ་ཤིང་འབྲས།
ca: fruit del pa
da: Brødfrugt
de: Brotfrucht
dv: ބަނބުކެޔޮ
eo: panfrukto
es: fruto del pan, frutipan, fruta del pan
fi: leipäpuu
fr: fruit à pain
hr: krušno drvo
id: sukun
it: frutto del pane
ja: パンの実
ko: 빵열매
la: Artocarpus Altilis
ms: sukun, ‏سوكون‎‎, kulur, كولور‎
nl: broodvrucht
pt: fruta-pão
ru: плод хлебного дерева
rw: Urubuto rw’umugati
th: สาเก
ty: Ùru
vi: xa kê, sa kê

en: jackfruit
de: Jackfrucht
fr: fruit du jacquier, fruit du jaquier, pomme jacque, pomme jaque, jacquier, jaquier
hr: jackfruit
it: giaca
pl: jackfruit

en: calluna vulgaris
hr: zelen vrijeska
la: calluna vulgaris

en: carissa, natal plum
la: Carissa macrocarpa

en: durian
ar: دوريان
de: Durian
es: durión
fi: durio
fr: durian
hr: durian
it: durian
nl: doerian
oc: Durian
pt: Durião, Durio
sr: Durijan
su: Kadu
sv: Durian
uk: Дуріан
vi: Chi Sầu riêng
zh: 榴槤屬

en: cranberry, cranberries
ar: عنبية حادة الخباء
az: mərcanı
ba: мүк еләге
be: журавіны
bg: червени боровинки, червена боровинка
ca: nabiu de grua
cs: klikva, klikvy
cy: llugaeron
da: tranebær
de: Moosbeeren, Cranberry, Cranberrys, Cranberries
eo: oksikoko
es: arándano rojo
et: jõhvikas, harilik jõhvikas
fa: کرنبری
fi: karpalo, karpalot
fo: tranuber
fr: canneberge, cranberries, cranberry, cranberrys, Canneberge crue, Cranberry crue
ga: mónóg
gl: arandeira vermella
gv: smeyr churree
he: חמוצית
hr: brusnica, brusnice, brusnica plod
hu: vörösáfonya
hy: լոռամրգի
id: kranberi
it: cranberry
ja: クランベリー
kk: мүкжидек
kv: турипув
lt: spanguolė
lv: dzērvene
mk: брусница
mn: цангис
mr: क्रॅनबेरी
nb: tranebær
nl: veenbessen, cranberry, cranberry's
nn: tranebær
os: сырхнæмыг
pl: żurawina, żurawiny, żurawin, żurawinowa, żurawinowy, żurawinowe, żurawinowej, żurawinowego, żurawinowych
pt: arandos, oxicocos
ro: merişoare, merișoare
ru: клюква
sh: brusnica
sk: kľukvy
sl: brusnice
sr: брусница
sv: tranbär
th: แครนเบอร์รี
tl: kranberya
uk: журавлина
vi: mạn việt quất
wa: bicoine
zh: 小紅莓

cs: šťáva z klikvy velkoplodé z koncentrátu
de: Cranberrysaft (Moosbeerensaft) aus Cranberrysaftkonzentrat
fr: jus de cranberry à base de concentré
it: succo di mirtillo rosso da concentrato

en: sugared cranberries
de: gesüßte Cranberries, Cranberries gesüßt
fi: sokeroitu karpalo, sokeroidut karpalot
hr: ušećerene brusnice
it: mirtilli rossi zuccherati

en: american cranberry
cs: klikva velkoplodá, klikvy velkoplodé
cy: llygaeren america
da: storfrugtet tranebær
de: großfrüchtige moosbeere
eo: oksikoko amerika
fi: amerikankarpalo
fr: airelle à gros fruits
hr: američka brusnica
hu: amerikai tőzegáfonya
it: mirtillo rosso americano
la: vaccinium macrocarpon
lt: stambiauogė spanguolė
nb: amerikansk tranebær
pl: żurawina wielkoowocowa
sk: kľukva veľkoplodá
sr: америчка брусница
sv: amerikanskt tranbär
zh: 大果蔓越梅